California, session 20252026, AB1677.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. (a) The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(1) The Public Utilities Commission’s statutory mandates, constitutional limitations, and fundamental finance principles all require the commission to consider the interests of ratepayers and the public and to avoid the compounding costs to ratepayers that result from authorizing revenue requirements that result in return on equity (ROE) investments that exceed public utilities’ costs of capital in the market and their operational needs.(2) ROEs over and above investors’ market-based expectations, the cost of capital, harms ratepayers in a myriad of ways, including all of the following harms:(A) The immediate costs of the excess ROE.(B) The cost of the incremental taxes owed on that excess ROE.(C) The additional costs of unnecessary investment incentivized by excess ROE, which includes not only the cost of the investment but also the costs of capital on the investment and the associated taxes.(D) The surplus shareholder profit from excess ROE on that unnecessary investment.(E) The associated taxes on that surplus profit.(3) The constitutional limitation on confiscation applied to establish a lower bound for public utility rates applies equally to establish an upper bound to public utility rates so as to prevent confiscation of ratepayer funds to support excessive public utility profits.(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to enact legislation that would reduce utility rates by 25 percent.SEC. 2. Section 454.05 is added to the Public Utilities Code, immediately following Section 454, to read:454.05. (a) If an electrical corporation or gas corporation proposes to change a rate, or to alter a classification, contract, practice, or rule so as to result resulting in a new rate based directly or indirectly on its request for return on invested capital, the commission shall require the electrical corporation or gas corporation to include in its proposal both of the following:(1) A study showing the amount of internally generated cash available to self-fund the investment needed to provide safe and reliable electrical or gas service, including deferred taxes, depreciation, and amortization, and the extent of the need to acquire external investment.(2) A study showing the relationship between capital structure and return on equity is optimized from the ratepayer perspective and minimizes the overall revenue requirement, including taxes.(b) The commission shall make findings consistent with Section 1705 on the matters specified in subdivision (a) to support an order authorizing a new rate pursuant to this section.(c) The commission shall not, for an electrical corporation or gas corporation, authorize a return on equity that exceeds the rate on long-term debt issued by the federal government by more than 400 basis points.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.